Utah statutes.
41-1a-115.   Division records -- Copies.
(1)  The division shall file each application received.
(2)  The division shall keep a record of each registration on a calendar year
basis as follows:
(a)  under a distinctive registration number assigned to the vehicle, vessel,
or outboard motor;
(b)  alphabetically, under the name of the owner of the vehicle, vessel, or
outboard motor;
(c)  under the identification number of the vehicle, vessel, or outboard
motor; and
(d)  in any manner the division finds desirable for compiling statistical
information or of comparative value for use in determining registration fees
in future years.
(3) (a)  The division shall maintain a current record of each certificate of
title it issues.
(b) (i)  The division shall file and retain every surrendered certificate of
title and every application for title to permit the tracing of title of the
vehicles designated in them.
(ii)  The retention period for division records shall be set by the Division
of Archives and Records Service in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 2,
Government Records Access and Management Act.
(4) (a)  The commission and officers of the division the commission designates
may prepare under the seal of the division and deliver upon request a
certified copy of any record of the division, including microfilmed records,
charging a fee, determined by the commission pursuant to Section 63J-1-504,
for each document authenticated.
(b)  The application shall include the requested information to identify the
applicant.
(c)  Each certified copy is admissible in any proceeding in any court in the
same manner as the original.
(5)  The division shall comply with Title 63G, Chapter 2, Government Records
Access and Management Act.
